Oklahoma, session 2026, SB591.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-162 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Free to


Speak Act”.


B. As used in this section:


1. “Employee” means an individual employed or contracted by a


public school or state institution of higher learning;

Req. No. 1330 Page 1


2. “Female” means an individual who naturally has, had, will


have, or would have but for a developmental or genetic anomaly or


historic accident the reproductive system that at some point


produces, transports, and utilizes eggs for fertilization;


3. “Male” means an individual who naturally has, had, will


have, or would have but for a developmental or genetic anomaly or


historic accident the reproductive system that at some point


produces, transports, and utilizes sperm for fertilization;


4. “Public school” means a public school district in this


state, a public charter school established pursuant to the Oklahoma


Charter Schools Act, and a technology center school district under


the governance of the State Board of Career and Technology


Education. Public school shall not include private schools or home


schools;


5. “Sex” means the physical condition of being male or female


based on genetics and physiology, as identified on an individual’s


original birth certificate;


6. “State institution of higher learning” means an institution


of higher education within The Oklahoma State System of Higher


Education; and


7. “Student” means an individual who is enrolled in a public


school or a state institution of higher learning.


C. An employee of a public school or institution of higher


learning, regardless of the scope of his or her official duties:

Req. No. 1330 Page 2


1. Shall not knowingly and intentionally address an


unemancipated minor student by a name other than the student’s legal


name, or a derivative thereof, or by a pronoun or title that is


inconsistent with the student’s sex without the written permission


of a student’s parent or legal guardian;


2. Shall not be subject to adverse employment action for


declining to address a person using a name other than the person’s


legal name, or a derivative thereof, or by a pronoun or title that


is inconsistent with the person’s sex; and


3. Shall not be subject to adverse employment action for


declining to identify his or her pronouns.


D. A student enrolled in a public school or state institution


of higher learning shall not be subject to any disciplinary action


for declining to:


1. Address a person using a name other than the person’s legal


name, or a derivative thereof, or by a pronoun or title that is


inconsistent with the person’s sex; and


2. Identify his or her pronouns.


E. An employee or student who suffers any direct or indirect


harm as a result of a violation of this act shall have a cause of


action for injunctive relief, monetary damages, reasonable attorney


fees and costs, and any other appropriate relief against a public


school or a state institution of higher learning. A cause of action



Req. No. 1330 Page 3


brought pursuant to this subsection shall be initiated within two


(2) years of the violation.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1330 EB 1/19/2025 5:39:29 AM































Req. No. 1330 Page 4